latvian.foma
# Vowels
define V [a | e | i | o | u ];

read lexc latvian.lexc
define Lexicon;

# Consonant doubling: 1-letter consonant doubled before -ing/-ed (beg/begging)
define LLidzskanuMija l -> ļ || _ "^" a;


# Consonant doubling: 1-letter consonant doubled before -ing/-ed (beg/begging)
define ConsonantDoubling g -> g g || _ "^" [i n g | e d ];

# E deletion: silent e dropped before -ing and -ed (make/making)
define EDeletion e -> 0 || _ "^" [ i n g | e d ] ;

# E insertion e added after -s, -z, -x, -ch, -sh before s (watch/watches)
define EInsertion [..] -> e || s | z | x | c h | s h _ "^" s ;

# Y replacement: -y changes to -ie before -s, -i before -ed (try/tries) 
define YReplacement y -> i e || _ "^" s    ,, 
                    y -> i   || _ "^" e d  ;

# K insertion: verbs ending with vowel + -c add -k (panic/panicked)
define KInsertion [..] -> k || V c _ "^" [e d | i n g];

# Spaces: change _ to " "
define Spaces "_" -> " ";

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

regex Lexicon .o. 
	  LLidzskanuMija .o. 
      ConsonantDoubling .o. 
      EDeletion .o. 
      EInsertion .o. 
      YReplacement .o. 
      KInsertion .o. 
	  Spaces .o. 
      Cleanup;
